Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-777
Career academy; establishment and
operation; duties; funding; department; define standards and criteria.

(1)
Any school district, with the approval of the State Department of Education,
may establish and operate a career academy. The purpose of a career academy
is to provide students with a career-based educational curriculum. A school
district may partner with another school district, an educational service
unit, a learning community, a postsecondary educational institution, or a
private entity in the establishment and operation of a career academy.

(2)
A career academy established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall:

(a)
Recruit students who seek a career-based curriculum, which curriculum shall
be based on criteria determined by the department;

(b) Recruit and
hire instructors based on their expertise in career-based education; and

(c)
Provide a rigorous academic curriculum with a transition component to prepare
students for the workforce, including, but not limited to, internships, job
training, and skills training.

(3) In addition to funding from the establishing
school district or any of the district's partners, a career academy may also
receive private donations for operating expenses.

(4) The department shall
define standards and criteria for (a) the establishment, evaluation, and continuing
approval of career academies, (b) career-based curriculum utilized by career
academies, (c) the necessary data elements and collection of data pertaining
to career academies, including, but not limited to, the number of students
enrolled in a career academy and their grade levels, and (d) the establishment
of advisory boards consisting of business and education representatives to
provide guidance and direction for the operation of career academies.

(5) The State Board of
Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this
section.

Laws 2012, LB870, § 4.